District of Columbia statutes.
5-542.03

Classification of aide to Fire Marshal.

The aide to the Fire Marshal shall be included as a fire inspector in salary class 2.

History

Aug. 1, 1958, 72 Stat. 483, Pub. L. 85-584, title II, § 203
Oct. 24, 1962, 76 Stat. 1243, Pub. L. 87-882 § 3(a)
Aug. 29, 1972, 86 Stat. 636, Pub. L. 92-410, title I, § 105(a)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-545.06a.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-409.
1973 Ed., § 4-826.